Idaho statutes. Title 50 MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS
Chapter 10
FINANCES

Sec.

§ 50-1001. Fiscal year.

The fiscal year of each city shall commence on the first day of October.

§ 50-1002. Annual budget.

The city council of each city shall, prior to passing the annual appropriation ordinance, prepare a budget, estimating the probable amount of money necessary for all purposes for which an appropriation is to be made, including interest and principal due on the bonded debt and sinking fund, itemizing and classifying the proposed expenditures by department, fund or service, as nearly as may be practicable, and specifying any fund balances accumulated under section 50-1005A, Idaho Code. To support such proposed expenditure, the council shall prepare an estimate of the total revenue anticipated during the ensuing fiscal year for which a budget is being prepared classifying such receipts by source as nearly as may be possible and practicable, said estimate to include any surplus not subject to the provisions of sections 50-1004 and 50-1005A, Idaho Code, nor shall said estimated revenue include funds accumulated under section 50-236, Idaho Code. The proposed budget for the ensuing fiscal year shall list expenditures and revenues during each of the two (2) previous fiscal years by fund and/or department. Following tentative approval of the revenues and expenditures estimated by the council, the same shall be entered at length in the journal of proceedings. Prior to certifying to the county commissioners, a notice of time and place of public hearing on the budget, which notice shall include the proposed expenditures and revenues by fund and/or department including the two (2) previous fiscal years, and a statement of the estimated revenue from property taxes and the total amount from sources other than property taxes of the city for the ensuing fiscal year, shall be published twice at least seven (7) days apart in the official newspaper. At said hearing any interested person may appear and show cause, if any he has, why such proposed budget should or should not be adopted.

§ 50-1003. Annual appropriations bill — Amending appropriation ordinance — Special appropriation upon petition or election.

The city council of each city shall, prior to the commencement of each fiscal year, pass an ordinance to be termed the annual appropriation ordinance, which in no event shall be greater than the amount of the proposed budget, in which the corporate authorities may appropriate such sum or sums of money as may be deemed necessary to defray all necessary expenses and liabilities of such corporation, not exceeding in the aggregate the amount of tax authorized to be levied during that year in addition to all other anticipated revenues. Provided, the amount appropriated from property tax revenues shall not exceed the amount of property tax revenue advertised pursuant to section 50-1002, Idaho Code.

Such ordinance shall specify the object and purposes for which such appropriations are made and the amount appropriated for each object or purpose. Said ordinance shall be filed with the office of the secretary of state.

The city council of any city may, by the same procedure as used in adopting the original appropriation ordinance at any time during the current fiscal year, amend the appropriation ordinance to a greater amount than that adopted, if after the adoption of the appropriation ordinance, additional revenue will accrue to the city during the current fiscal year as a result of increase in state or federal grants or allocations, or as a result of an increase in an enterprise fund or funds to finance the operation and maintenance of governmental facilities and services which are entirely or predominantly self-supporting by user charges, or as a result of an increase in revenues from any source other than ad valorem tax revenues. A city whose property tax certification is made for the current fiscal year may amend its budget and annual appropriation ordinance, pursuant to the notice and hearing requirements of section 50-1002, Idaho Code, prior to certification to the county commissioners.

No further appropriation, except as herein provided, shall be made at any other time within such fiscal year unless the proposition to make each appropriation has been first sanctioned by a majority of the legal voters of such city, either by petition signed by them equal in number to a majority of the number who voted at the last general city election, or approved at a special election duly called therefor, and all appropriations shall end with the fiscal year for which they are made.

§ 50-1004. Special tax assessment — Warrant redemption fund.

At the time of passing the annual appropriation ordinance, said city councils, unless provision shall have been made as provided by law for the funding, refunding, purchase, redemption or exchange of the outstanding city warrant indebtedness, must, whenever any city shall have warrants outstanding and unpaid, for the payment of which there are no funds in the city treasury, in addition to other taxes provided by law, if such warrants amount to a sum equal to five per cent (5%) or more of the value of the taxable property of such city, levy and include a special tax assessment of not to exceed two tenths per cent (.2%) of market value for assessment purposes in such annual appropriation bill; if such warrants amount to a sum equal to four per cent (4%) and less than five per cent (5%) of such taxable property, they must levy and include a special tax or assessment of not to exceed sixteen hundredths per cent (.16%) of market value for assessment purposes in such annual appropriation bill; if such warrants amount to a sum equal to three per cent (3%) and less than four per cent (4%) of such taxable property, they must levy and include a special tax or assessment of not to exceed twelve hundredths per cent (.12%) of market value for assessment purposes in such annual appropriation bill; if such warrants amount to a sum equal to two per cent (2%) and less than three per cent (3%) of such taxable property, they must levy and include a special tax or assessment of not to exceed eight hundredths per cent (.08%) of market value for assessment purposes in such annual appropriation bill; and if such warrants amount to one per cent (1%) and less than two per cent (2%) of such taxable property they must levy and include a special tax or assessment of not to exceed four hundredths per cent (.04%) of market value for assessment purposes in such annual appropriation bill; and if such warrants amount to less than one per cent (1%) of such taxable property, then they must levy and include such special tax or assessment on the dollar in such annual appropriation bill as shall be sufficient to pay such warrants.

All moneys arising from such special tax or assessment shall be placed in a special fund to be known as the “Warrant Redemption Fund” and the redemption of such warrants shall be paid exclusively from this fund.

All moneys in the city treasury at the end of each fiscal year not needed for that year’s expenses and applicable thereto, and not subject to the provisions of section 50-1005A, Idaho Code, shall be transferred to said “Warrant Redemption Fund,” if such there be.

§ 50-1005. Expenses not to precede appropriation

Interim ordinance. [Repealed.]

§ 50-1005A. Accumulation of fund balances.

Cities may accumulate fund balances at the end of a fiscal year and carry over such fund balances into the ensuing fiscal year sufficient to achieve or maintain city operations on a cash basis. A fund balance is the excess of the assets of a fund over its liabilities and reserves.

§ 50-1006. Expenditures not to exceed appropriation — Exceptions.

The mayor and council shall have no power to appropriate, issue or draw on the treasurer for money unless the same has been appropriated or ordered by ordinance, or the claim for the payment of which such order or warrant is issued has been allowed according to the provisions of sections 50-1001 through 50-1042, Idaho Code, and appropriations for the class or object out of which such claim is payable has been made as provided in sections 50-1001 through 50-1042, Idaho Code. Neither the city council nor any department or officer of the corporation shall add to the corporation expenditures in any year anything over and above the amount provided in the annual appropriation bill for the year, except as herein otherwise specially provided; and no expenditures for any improvement to be paid shall exceed in any year the amount allocated for such improvement in the annual appropriation bill, provided, however, that nothing herein contained shall prevent one-half (1/2) plus one (1) of the members of the full council from declaring an emergency, the necessity for which was caused by casualty, accident, or act of nature after such annual appropriation is made. In the event of a declared emergency caused by casualty, accident, or act of nature, the city council may order the mayor and finance committee to borrow a sufficient sum to provide for the expense incurred in abating the emergency or the making of any repairs or restoration of improvements, for a space of time not exceeding the close of the next fiscal year, which sum and interest shall be added to the amount authorized to be raised in the next general tax levy and embraced therein.

Should any judgment be obtained against the corporation, the mayor and finance committee, under the sanction of the city council, may borrow for a space of time not exceeding the close of the next fiscal year, a sufficient amount to pay the same, which sum and interest shall in like manner be added to the amount authorized to be raised in the general tax levy of the next year and embraced therein.

§ 50-1007. Certification and collection of city taxes.

The council of each city not later than [the Thursday prior to] the second Monday in September, as provided in section 63-803(3), Idaho Code, shall certify to the county commissioners of the county, the total amount required from a property tax upon property within the city to raise the amount of money fixed by their budget as previously approved which shall include all special taxes assessed as provided by law. The amount which may be so certified, assessed and collected shall not exceed the maximum levy provided by section 50-235, Idaho Code, to defray its general expenses for either the current or the ensuing fiscal year, together with any special taxes, authorized under the provisions of this act, and such tax as may be authorized by law to be levied for the payment of outstanding bonds and debts. In all sales for delinquent city taxes, if there be other delinquent taxes from the same person, or lien upon the same property, the sale shall be for all the delinquent taxes; and such sales and all sales made under and by virtue of this section or the provisions of law herein referred to shall be of the same validity, and in all respects be deemed and treated as though sales had been made for delinquent state and county taxes exclusively.

§ 50-1008. Collection of special assessments — Certification to tax collector — Widow’s exemption.

All special assessments levied in any city to which the provisions of this act are made applicable shall be due and payable to the city treasurer and, if not paid within thirty (30) days after mailing of notification of assessment, shall be declared delinquent and be certified to the tax collector of the county by the city clerk, not later than the first day of August and shall be by said tax collector placed upon the tax roll and collected in the same manner and subject to the same penalties as other city taxes; provided, however, that special assessments certified to the tax collector which are placed on property qualifying for a widow’s exemption may be returned to the taxing district from which they originated if the special assessments are not paid within three (3) years. All money received on special assessments shall be held by the city treasurer as a special fund to be applied to the payment of the improvement for which the assessment was made, and said money shall be used for no other purpose whatever unless to reimburse such city for money expended for such improvement.

§ 50-1009. Payment by tax collector to city treasurer. [Repealed.]

§ 50-1010. Audit of city finances — Audit to be filed.

It shall be the duty of the council in every city to cause to be made a full and complete audit of the financial statements of such city as required in section 67-450B, Idaho Code.

The council shall be required to include all necessary expenses for carrying out the provisions of this section in its annual budget.

§ 50-1011. Publication of financial statements — Noncompliance.

It shall be the duty of the city treasurer to cause to be published quarterly during each fiscal year for at least one (1) insertion in the official newspaper of the city, a full statement of each separate account, fund or appropriation for the year to date, and balances of the debits and credits belonging thereto, indicating salaries, capital outlay and a percentage comparison to the original appropriation. All published financial statements shall include the following: “Citizens are invited to inspect the detailed supporting records of the above financial statements.” Such statement shall be published within thirty (30) days from the end of each quarter, except for [the statement for] the final quarter of the fiscal year which shall be published no later than thirty (30) days from the date of completion of the annual audit. Notwithstanding the above, no one shall be precluded from making this filing prior to the completion of an audit. Failure upon the part of the treasurer of any city to comply with the requirements of this section shall be deemed a misdemeanor.

§ 50-1012. Accounting system. [Repealed.]

§ 50-1013. Deposit and investment of funds.

The treasurer shall be required to keep all money in his hands belonging to the corporation in such place or places of deposit as shall be provided by ordinance; provided, however, that the treasurer may be directed and empowered by resolution, to invest any money in his hands in any of the following:

Revenue bonds issued by the revenue bond act.

City coupon bonds provided for under section 50-1019, Idaho Code.

Local improvement district bonds provided for under chapter 17, title 50, Idaho Code.

Time deposit accounts with public depositories.

Bonds, treasury bills, interest-bearing notes, or other obligations of the United States, or those for which the faith and credit of the United States are pledged for the payment of principal and interest.

General obligation bonds of this state, or those for which the faith and credit of this state are pledged for the payment of principal and interest.

General obligation bonds of any county, city, metropolitan water district, municipal utility district, school district or other taxing district of this state.

Notes, bonds, debentures, or other similar obligations issued by the farm credit system or institutions forming a part thereof under the farm credit act of 1971 (12 U.S.C. sections 2001-2259) and all acts of congress amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto; in bonds or debentures of the federal home loan bank board established under the federal home loan bank act (12 U.S.C. sections 1421-1449); in bonds, debentures and other obligations of the federal national mortgage association established under the national housing act (12 U.S.C. sections 1701-1750g) as amended, and in the bonds of any federal home loan bank established under said act and in other obligations of agencies and instrumentalities of the government of the state of Idaho or of the United States.

Bonds, notes or other similar obligations issued by public corporations of the state of Idaho including, but not limited to, the Idaho state building authority, the Idaho housing authority [Idaho housing and finance association] and the Idaho water resource board, but such investment shall not extend beyond seven (7) days.

Repurchase agreements and reverse repurchase agreements covered by any legal investment for the state of Idaho or as otherwise allowed by this section, provided that reverse repurchase agreements shall only be used for the purpose of liquidity and not for leverage or speculation.

Tax anticipation bonds or notes, income and revenue anticipation bonds or notes and registered warrants of the state of Idaho or of taxing districts of the state of Idaho.

Savings accounts including, but not limited to, accounts on which interest or dividends are paid and upon which negotiable orders of withdrawal may be drawn, and similar transaction accounts.

Time deposit accounts and other savings accounts of state or federal savings and loan associations located within the geographical boundaries of the state in amounts not to exceed the insurance provided by the federal savings and loan corporation, including, but not limited to, accounts on which interest or dividends are paid and upon which negotiable orders of withdrawal may be drawn, and similar transaction accounts.

Share, savings and deposit accounts of state and federal credit unions located within the geographical boundaries of the state in amounts not to exceed the insurance provided by the national credit union share insurance fund and/or any other authorized share guaranty corporation, including, but not limited to, accounts on which interest or dividends are paid and upon which negotiable orders of withdrawal may be drawn, and similar transaction accounts.

Prime banker’s acceptances.

Prime commercial paper.

Money market funds, mutual funds, or any other similar funds whose portfolios consist of any allowed investment as specified in this section.

Bonds, debentures or notes of any corporation organized, controlled and operating within the United States which have, at the time of their purchase, an A rating or higher by a commonly known rating service.

§ 50-1013A. Investment of deposits of deferred compensation plans.

A municipal corporation, in administering a deferred compensation plan, shall be governed by the uniform prudent investor act, chapter 5, title 68, Idaho Code.

§ 50-1014. Transfer of funds.

The city council of the cities may transfer an unexpended balance in one fund to the credit of another fund.

§ 50-1015. Disposition of license fees and fines.

All license fees of every character and all fines and penalties recovered under the provisions of any city ordinance shall be paid into the city treasury for the use and benefit of the general fund, except that the council may transfer and distribute the moneys or revenue, in whole or in part, received and recovered from fines, penalties, forfeitures and costs for enforcing and prosecuting violations of ordinances regulating traffic (pedestrian, motor vehicle or bicycle), including but not limited to parking, moving and nonmoving violations of such traffic regulations to the fund or funds established by ordinance dedicated for the purpose of paying the indebtedness (principal and interest) incurred for the acquisition and construction of off-street parking facilities, including land, buildings, structures, equipment and appurtenances necessary for the parking of motor vehicles. The council may also by ordinance transfer and distribute any portion of said fines, penalties, forfeitures and costs, after deducting that amount required to pay an indebtedness (principal and interest) incurred for acquiring and constructing said off-street parking facilities, for the purpose of maintaining and operating said off-street parking facilities.

§ 50-1015A. Disposition of parking fees and fines.

All moneys collected for the regulation of parking on city streets, whether collected through city parking meters or by the city clerk, shall not be subject to disposition in the same manner as moneys collected for violations of city ordinances, but shall be placed in the general fund of the city.

§ 50-1016. Deductions from wages.

Any city may deduct, upon written approval of the individual employee, sums certain from said employee’s salary or wages for the purpose of paying said sums for premiums on group life, health, accident, disability, hospital and surgical insurance, or any other purposes approved by the city council. Any city may pay all or any part of such deductions as approved by the council.

Any city may adopt a city retirement and pension plan for the benefit of its employees and for that purpose may deduct, upon written approval of the individual employee, sums certain from said employee’s wages as a contribution to said plan and any city may pay all or any part of such premiums as approved by the council and may make such other contributions as may be required to make such plan actuarially sound. Such plan may be administered by the employer or by a third party organization selected through a competitive selection process. Further, the employer may cooperate with other city or county employers for joint administration of the plan.

§ 50-1017. Presentation of claims.

All claims against the city shall be approved by the city council prior to the payment of such claims and the city council shall establish and maintain an adequate and reasonable system of internal accounting controls. No costs shall be recovered against such city in any action brought against it for any unliquidated claim which has not been presented to the city council for payment, nor upon claims allowed in part, unless the recovery shall be for a greater sum than the amount allowed with interest due.

§ 50-1018. Payment of claims.

Upon approval of claims by the council, payment may be ordered by warrant or by electronic means, signed by or authorized by the mayor and clerk or by check or by electronic means signed by or authorized by the mayor and treasurer. The order for their payment shall specify the particular fund or appropriation out of which they are payable, as specified in the annual appropriation bill. In the absence of sufficient funds, the council may, by resolution, order payment of claims by money borrowed by either:

Registered warrants as provided in section 31-2125, Idaho Code, or

By issuing its tax [revenue] anticipation notes as provided in section 63-3102, Idaho Code, or

Short term borrowing not involved with the tax effort in anticipation of approved federal or state grants.

§ 50-1019. Purposes for which bonds may be issued — Limitation on amount.

Every city incorporated under the laws of the territory of Idaho or of the state of Idaho shall have power and authority to issue city coupon bonds not to exceed in aggregate at any time, ten per cent (10%) of the assessed full cash valuation [two per cent (2%) of the market value for assessment purposes] of the real and personal property in said city, according to the assessment of the preceding year, for any or all of the purposes specified [in subsections 1 through 10 of this section,] as follows:

To provide for constructing, laying out, grading, curbing, draining, sidewalking or otherwise improving streets, alleys, intersections, crossings and crosswalks; and to construct, or aid in the construction of bridges across streams within or contiguous to, or within one (1) mile of the exterior limits of, such city.

To provide for the funding, refunding, purchase and redemption of the outstanding indebtedness, bonds may be issued under this section for such purposes, without submission of the question of issuance of such bonds to the electors of the city, when the same can be done to the profit and benefit of such city without incurring any additional liability.

To provide for the establishment of hospitals and cemeteries, either within or without the corporate limits of such city.

To provide for the purchase, improvement and equipment of lands and buildings thereon, for public parks, monuments, recreation facilities and zoos, either within or without the corporate limits of such city.

To provide for the purchase, erection, construction and furnishing of city public libraries.

To provide for the establishment of a fire department by the purchase of building sites, buildings, and suitable equipment and apparatus necessary to provide fire protection.

To provide for the purchase, acquisition, improvement and equipment of aviation facilities either wholly or partly within or without the corporate limits of such city, or wholly or partly within or without the state of Idaho.

To provide for flood control by acquisition and purchase of right-of-way and to establish, alter, enlarge, improve, reconstruct and change the channels of watercourses or any stream, river or body of water within or without the corporate limits of the city.

To provide for the acquisition, construction, remodeling, improvement or otherwise, of buildings for public use, together with all necessary appurtenant facilities and equipment, including all necessary land for building sites, either within or without the corporate limits of such city.

To provide for the purchase, acquisition, erection and construction of off-street parking sites, structures, buildings, facilities, equipment and appurtenances.

To provide for the purchase, acquisition, improvement and equipment of transit systems.

§ 50-1020. Waterworks — Light and power plants — Sewerage systems.

Every city incorporated under the laws of the territory of Idaho or of the state of Idaho shall have power and authority to issue city coupon bonds in a sufficient amount to acquire, by purchase or otherwise, waterworks plants and water supply, light and power plants, storm sewers and sanitary sewerage systems, and to construct, enlarge, extend, repair, alter and improve such plants or systems notwithstanding the percentage limitation of the previous section. “Waterworks plants and water supply” include by way of example but not by way of limitation, a public water system providing water at any temperature for space heating or cooling, culinary, sanitary, recreational or therapeutic uses.

The amount for which bonds may be issued for purposes as in this section provided shall be determined by the council and stated in the ordinance therefor, and shall be authorized in such amount as the city council shall deem necessary by one or more bond elections, called as provided in section 50-1026, Idaho Code, or amendatory act.

§ 50-1021. Previous issues validated.

All bonds authorized at any city election heretofore held, as provided in said section 50-1026[, Idaho Code], or acts amendatory thereof, for the purpose of acquiring adequate plants for such city by purchase or otherwise, and by enlarging, extending[,] repairing, altering or improving any existing city water, light and power or sewage [sewerage] systems, shall be deemed to have been authorized for all or any of the purposes for which such bonds may hereafter be issued under this section, and all such bonds which at such election have been heretofore authorized, when issued and sold, are hereby declared to be legal and binding obligations of such city, provided all requirements of law have been fully complied with, and the same are hereby declared to be of like force and effect as if the city, at the time such election was called and held, had possessed all the power herein granted and conferred.

§ 50-1022. Joint services.

In addition to the authority contained in the foregoing sections and in sections 67-2326 through and including 67-2333, Idaho Code, it shall be lawful for two (2) or more cities, so situated with reference to each other that it is practicable and convenient to furnish the said inhabitants thereof with water, power or sewerage from a single plant and system, to join in the construction or purchase of such plant or system upon a substantial compliance with the provisions of sections 50-1022 to 50-1025, Idaho Code, and not otherwise.

§ 50-1023. Joint services — Agreement on apportionment.

Whenever two (2) or more cities desire jointly to construct water, power or sewage [sewerage] systems, it shall be necessary for the councils to agree among themselves as to the kind and character of construction of the said plant and system, the amount of service to which each city shall be entitled, the approximate cost of such systems and the proportionate part thereof which shall be borne by each city, which proportionate part shall be as nearly just and equitable as possible, and shall be determined in such manner as may be agreeable to all concerned.

§ 50-1024. Joint services — Bond election in each city.

Whenever the proportionate share of the cost of such construction or purchase to be borne by each city has been determined, an election shall be held in each city as now provided by law in similar cases, for the purpose of determining whether or not coupon bonds shall be issued by such city in an amount equal to its proportionate share of the cost of such construction or purchase.

§ 50-1025. Joint services — Committee for construction or purchase.

If, in each of said cities the question of issuing bonds for the construction or purchase of such systems, plants and equipment shall have been favorably decided by the electors of such city, said bonds shall be issued as now provided by law, and the city councils of the cities in question shall meet, and organize and appoint a committee to be composed of their own members, upon which each of said cities shall have equal representation, for the purpose of constructing such plants and systems or for purchasing the same if such is available. The said committee shall have all necessary power to make contracts for the construction or purchase of such plants and systems and to bind the said cities as herein contemplated.

§ 50-1026. City bonds — Ordinance — Election.

Whenever the city council of a city shall deem it advisable to issue the coupon bonds of such city, the mayor and council shall provide therefor by ordinance, which shall specify and set forth all the purposes, objects, matters and things required by section 57-203, Idaho Code, and make provision for the collection of an annual tax sufficient to pay the interest on such proposed bonds as it falls due, and also to constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the principal thereof within thirty (30) years from the time of contracting the same as required by the constitution and laws of the state of Idaho.

The ordinance shall also provide the date for holding an election that is in accordance with the dates authorized in section 50-405, Idaho Code, which falls more than forty-five (45) days after the clerk of the political subdivision orders that such election shall be held. Notice shall be given in the official newspaper of the city by the county clerk in accordance with election law in title 34, Idaho Code. Such election shall be conducted as other city elections. The voting at such elections must be by ballot, and the ballot used shall be substantially as follows: “In favor of issuing bonds to the amount of .... dollars for the purpose stated in Ordinance No. ....,” and “Against issuing bonds to the amount of .... dollars for the purpose stated in Ordinance No. ....” If at such election, held as provided in this chapter, two-thirds (2/3) of the qualified electors voting at such election assent to the issuing of such bonds and the incurring of the indebtedness thereby created for the purpose aforesaid, such bonds shall be issued in the manner provided by the laws of the state of Idaho.

§ 50-1026A. City bonds — Pledge of revenues.

In the ordinance required in section 50-1026, Idaho Code, providing for the issuance of bonds of a city to be issued to acquire, improve, construct or extend a revenue producing system or facility to be owned and operated by the city, the city council may pledge, as an additional source of payment of such bonds, all or any part of the revenues derived or to be derived from rates, fees, tolls, or charges imposed for the services, facilities, or commodities furnished by the revenue producing system or facility to be so acquired, improved or extended.

The notice of the election on bonds provided for in section 50-1026, Idaho Code, shall describe any pledge of revenues made pursuant to this section. The proposition appearing on the ballot provided for in section 50-1026, Idaho Code, shall indicate that the bonds are to be additionally secured by a pledge of revenues of designated revenue producing systems or facilities owned and operated by the city.

The city council of a city may, in the ordinance required in section 50-1026, Idaho Code, providing for the issuance of bonds to which revenues have been pledged as provided in this section, covenant to prescribe and collect reasonable rates, fees, tolls or charges for the services, facilities, or commodities furnished by any revenue producing system or facility owned and operated by the city, all or a portion of the revenues of which have been pledged to bonds of the city as provided in this section, and may covenant to prescribe and collect such rates, fees, tolls or charges as will produce revenues sufficient, in addition to any other requirements of law, to pay all or a portion of the maturing principal of an interest on the bonds to which such revenues have been pledged.

The provisions of section 57-214, Idaho Code, to the contrary notwithstanding, bonds of a city to which revenues have been pledged as provided in this section, if issued to provide electric improvements or facilities, may be sold in such manner and at such price as the city council may in its discretion determine advisable, provided that such bonds may not be issued to acquire generation, transmission, or distribution facilities owned by other utilities without the consent of the utility owning the improvement or facility. Bonds of a city to which revenues have been pledged as provided in this section may be issued in coupon or registered form. The city council may provide for the use of a portion of the proceeds of sale of bonds to which revenues have been pledged as provided in this section to pay interest on the bonds during the period to be covered by the construction of the facility or improvement for which the bonds are to be issued and to establish such reserves as the city council shall deem to be necessary.

The provisions of section 50-1041, Idaho Code, shall not apply to bonds of a city to which revenues have been pledged as provided in this section. Such bonds shall be deemed not to have been issued under the revenue bond act.

§ 50-1027. Revenue bonds — Short title.

The following fifteen (15) sections may be cited as the Revenue Bond Act.

§ 50-1028. Grant of authority.

Any city acquiring, constructing, reconstructing, improving, bettering or extending any works pursuant to this act, shall manage such works in the most efficient manner consistent with sound economy and public advantage, to the end that the services of such works shall be furnished at the lowest possible cost. No city shall operate any works primarily as a source of revenue to the city, but shall operate all such works for the use and benefit of those served by such works and for the promotion of the welfare and for the improvement of the health, safety, comfort and convenience of the inhabitants of the city.

§ 50-1029. Definitions.

For the purpose of this act, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context, the following terms shall be ascribed the following meanings:

The term “works” shall include water systems, drainage systems, sewerage systems, recreation facilities, off-street parking facilities, airport facilities and air navigation facilities, electric systems or any of them as herein defined;

The term “water system” shall include reservoirs, storage facilities, water mains, conduits, aqueducts, pipelines, pumping stations, filtration plants, and all appurtenances and machinery necessary or useful for obtaining, storing, treating, purifying or transporting water for domestic uses or purposes. The term “domestic uses or purposes” includes by way of example but not by way of limitation the use of water at any temperature for space heating or cooling, culinary, sanitary, recreational or therapeutic purposes;

The term “sewerage system” shall include intercepting sewers, outfall sewers, force mains, collecting sewers, pumping stations, ejector stations, treatment plants, structures, buildings, machinery, equipment, connections and all other appurtenances necessary, useful or convenient for the collection, transportation, treatment, purification, and disposal of the sewage of any city or any part of territory included within the territorial limits of any city;

The term “off-street parking” shall include all machinery, equipment and appurtenances, including lands, easements, rights-of-way and buildings required, necessary or useful for the parking of motor vehicles on lands or places other than public highways;

The term “airport facilities and air navigation facilities” shall include land acquisition, construction costs, buildings, equipment, and other necessary appurtenances, either wholly or partly within or without the corporate limits of such political subdivision of the state or owned or operated by a regional airport authority as defined by law, or wholly or partly within or without the state of Idaho, which are hereby deemed to be for a public purpose, which facilities are to be financed for, or to be leased, sold or otherwise disposed of to private persons, associations or corporations, or to be held by the political subdivision of the state or regional airport authority as defined by law;

The term “rehabilitate existing electrical generating facilities” shall include the reconstruction, replacement, and betterment of existing generation facilities, properties and other related structures, together with all necessary equipment and appurtenances related thereto, used in or useful for the generation of electricity, including power plants, turbine generators, dams, penstocks, step-up transformers, electrical equipment and other facilities related to hydroelectric production plants, and related facilities for flood control, environmental, public recreation and fish and wildlife mitigation and enhancement purposes made necessary in order to comply with applicable state and federal requirements, but does not include transmission and distribution lines and their related structures, equipment and appurtenances;

The term “drainage system” shall include ditches, channels, creeks, ponds, intake structures, diversion structures, levies, storm sewers, pump stations, force mains, buildings, easements, machinery, equipment, connections and all other appurtenances necessary, useful or convenient for the collection, treatment and disposal of any surface water, nuisance ground or subsurface water or stormwater of any city; and